Washington statutes.
RCW 31.12.691

Liquidation dividends—Approval of court.

At any time after the expiration of the date fixed for the presentation of claims, the receiver, subject to the approval of the court, may declare one or more liquidation dividends out of the funds remaining after the payment of expenses.

[ 1997 c 397 s 76.]